fi: Aminohapon alatyyppi: Beeta-alaniini; Haaraketjuiset aminohapot (BCAA); Sitrulliini; Välttämättömät aminohapot (EAA); Glutamiini; Glysiini; L-arginiini; L-karnitiini; Tauriini; Muu
ko: 아미노산 하위 유형: 베타 알라닌; 분지쇄 아미노산 (BCAA); 시트룰린; 필수 아미노산 (EAA); 글루타민; 글리신; L-아르기닌; L-카르니틴; 타우린; 기타
el: Υποτύπος αμινοξέος: Βήτα-αλανίνη; Διακλαδισμένα αμινοξέα (BCAA); Κιτρουλίνη; Απαραίτητα αμινοξέα (EAA); Γλουταμίνη; Γλυκίνη; L-αργινίνη; L-καρνιτίνη; Ταυρίνη; Άλλο
hr-HR: Podvrsta aminokiselina: Beta-alanin; Razgranate aminokiseline (BCAA); Citrulin; Esencijalne aminokiseline (EAA); Glutamin; Glicin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Ostalo
pt-BR: Subtipo de aminoácido: Beta-alanina; Aminoácidos de cadeia ramificada (BCAA); Citrulina; Aminoácidos essenciais (EAA); Glutamina; Glicina; L-arginina; L-carnitina; Taurina; Outro
nl: Aminozuur subtype: Bèta-alanine; Vertakte keten aminozuren (BCAA); Citrulline; Essentiële aminozuren (EAA); Glutamine; Glycine; L-arginine; L-carnitine; Taurine; Andere
ja: アミノ酸サブタイプ: ベータアラニン; 分岐鎖アミノ酸（BCAA）; シトルリン; 必須アミノ酸（EAA）; グルタミン; グリシン; L-アルギニン; L-カルニチン; タウリン; その他
tr: Amino asit alt türü: Beta-alanin; Dallanmış zincirli amino asitler (BCAA); Sitrulin; Esansiyel amino asitler (EAA); Glutamin; Glisin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Diğer
sk-SK: Podtyp aminokyselín: Beta-alanín; Vetvené aminokyseliny (BCAA); Citrulín; Esenciálne aminokyseliny (EAA); Glutamín; Glycín; L-arginín; L-karnitín; Taurín; Iné
zh-CN: 氨基酸亚型: β-丙氨酸; 支链氨基酸 (BCAA); 瓜氨酸; 必需氨基酸 (EAA); 谷氨酰胺; 甘氨酸; L-精氨酸; 左旋肉碱; 牛磺酸; 其他
da: Aminosyreundertype: Beta-alanin; Forgrenede aminosyrer (BCAA); Citrullin; Essentielle aminosyrer (EAA); Glutamin; Glycin; L-arginin; L-carnitin; Taurin; Andet
ru: Подтип аминокислоты: Бета-аланин; Аминокислоты с разветвленной цепью (BCAA); Цитруллин; Незаменимые аминокислоты (EAA); Глутамин; Глицин; L-аргинин; L-карнитин; Таурин; Другой
hu: Aminosav-altípus: Béta-alanin; Elágazó láncú aminosavak (BCAA); Citrullin; Esszenciális aminosavak (EAA); Glutamin; Glicin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Egyéb
de: Aminosäure-Untertyp: Beta-Alanin; Verzweigtkettige Aminosäuren (BCAA); Citrullin; Essentielle Aminosäuren (EAA); Glutamin; Glycin; L-Arginin; L-Carnitine; Taurin; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 氨基酸亞型: β-丙氨酸; 支鏈氨基酸 (BCAA); 瓜氨酸; 必需氨基酸 (EAA); 麩醯胺酸; 甘氨酸; 左旋精氨酸; 左旋肉鹼; 牛磺酸; 其他
bg-BG: Подвид аминокиселина: Бета-аланин; Разклонени аминокиселини (BCAA); Цитрулин; Есенциални аминокиселини (EAA); Глутамин; Глицин; L-аргинин; L-карнитин; Таурин; Други
th: ชนิดย่อยของกรดอะมิโน: เบต้า-อะลานีน; กรดอะมิโนสายโซ่กิ่ง (BCAA); ซิทรูลีน; กรดอะมิโนจำเป็น (EAA); กลูตามีน; ไกลซีน; แอล-อาร์จินีน; แอล-คาร์นิทีน; ทอรีน; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Aminorūgščių potipis: Beta-alaninas; Šakotosios grandinės aminorūgštys (BCAA); Citrulinas; Esminės aminorūgštys (EAA); Glutaminas; Glicinas; L-argininas; L-karnitinas; Taurinas; Kita
nb: Aminosyre subtype: Beta-alanin; Forgrenede aminosyrer (BCAA); Sitrullin; Essensielle aminosyrer (EAA); Glutamin; Glycin; L-arginin; L-carnitin; Taurin; Annet
en: Amino acid subtype: Beta-alanine; Branched-chain amino acids (BCAA); Citrulline; Essential amino acids (EAA); Glutamine; Glycine; L-arginine; L-carnitine; Taurine; Other
pl: Podtyp aminokwasu: Beta-alanina; Aminokwasy rozgałęzione (BCAA); Cytrulina; Aminokwasy egzogenne (EAA); Glutamina; Glicyna; L-arginina; L-karnityna; Tauryna; Inne
cs: Podtyp aminokyseliny: Beta-alanin; Aminokyseliny s rozvětveným řetězcem (BCAA); Citrulin; Esenciální aminokyseliny (EAA); Glutamin; Glycin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Jiné
ro-RO: Subtip de aminoacid: Beta-alanină; Aminoacizi cu catenă ramificată (BCAA); Citrulină; Aminoacizi esențiali (EAA); Glutamină; Glicină; L-arginină; L-carnitină; Taurină; Altele
pt-PT: Subtipo de aminoácido: Beta-alanina; Aminoácidos de cadeia ramificada (BCAA); Citrulina; Aminoácidos essenciais (EAA); Glutamina; Glicina; L-arginina; L-carnitina; Taurina; Outro
sl-SI: Podvrsta aminokislin: Beta-alanin; Razvejane aminokisline (BCAA); Citrulin; Esencialne aminokisline (EAA); Glutamin; Glicin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Drugo
es: Subtipo de aminoácido: Beta-alanina; Aminoácidos de cadena ramificada (BCAA); Citrulina; Aminoácidos esenciales (EAA); Glutamina; Glicina; L-arginina; L-carnitina; Taurina; Otros
fr: Sous-type d’acide aminé: Bêta-alanine; Acides aminés à chaîne ramifiée (BCAA); Citrulline; Acides aminés essentiels (AAE); Glutamine; Glycine; L-arginine; L-carnitine; Taurine; Autre
vi: Loại phụ axit amin: Beta-alanine; Axit amin chuỗi nhánh (BCAA); Citrulline; Axit amin thiết yếu (EAA); Glutamine; Glycine; L-arginine; L-carnitine; Taurine; Khác
it: Sottotipo di aminoacido: Beta-alanina; Aminoacidi a catena ramificata (BCAA); Citrullina; Aminoacidi essenziali (EAA); Glutammina; Glicina; L-arginina; L-carnitina; Taurina; Altro
sv: Aminosyraundertyp: Beta-alanin; Grenade aminosyror (BCAA); Citrullin; Essentiella aminosyror (EAA); Glutamin; Glycin; L-arginin; L-karnitin; Taurin; Övrigt